Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 7. Required Training.

Sec. 14.20.680.
Required alcohol and drug related disabilities training.

A school district or regional educational attendance area shall train each teacher, administrator, counselor, and specialist on the needs of individual students who have alcohol or drug related disabilities. The training must utilize the best available educational technology and include an overview of medical and psychological characteristics associated with alcohol or drug related disabilities, family issues, and the specific educational needs of students with alcohol or drug related disabilities.

A school district or regional educational attendance area shall provide the training required under (a) of this section on a schedule adopted by the governing body of a school district or regional educational attendance area.

History.

(§ 1 ch 152 SLA 1990; am § 12 ch 2 SSSLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective October 7, 2015, rewrote (b), which read, “A newly hired teacher, administrator, counselor, or specialist who has not previously received the training required under (a) of this section shall receive the required training within 45 days after the first day the teacher, administrator, counselor, or specialist begins to work.”